Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 20. Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.
Sec. 28.20.440.
Motor vehicle liability policy defined; required provisions.

In this chapter, “motor vehicle liability policy” means an “owner policy” or an “operator’s policy” containing an agreement or endorsement as provided in this section, or certified as provided in AS

28.20.410

or

28.20.420

as proof of financial responsibility for the future, and issued, except as otherwise provided in AS

28.20.420

, by an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named as insured.

The owner’s policy of liability insurance must

designate by description or appropriate reference all vehicles that it covers;

insure the person named and every other person using the vehicle with the express or implied permission of the named insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the vehicle within the United States or Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each vehicle, as follows: $50,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $100,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and $25,000 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident;

contain coverage in not less than the amounts set out in (2) of this subsection for the protection of the persons insured under the policy who are legally entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of uninsured or underinsured motor vehicles because of bodily injury or death, or damage to or destruction of property arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of the uninsured or underinsured motor vehicle; this coverage must comply with the provisions of AS

28.20.445

.

The operator’s policy of liability insurance must insure the person named as insured against loss from the liability imposed upon the person by law for damages arising out of the use by the person of any motor vehicle not owned by the person, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are required for an owner’s policy of liability insurance.

The motor vehicle liability policy must state the name and address of the named insured, the coverage, the premium charges, the policy period, and the limits of liability, and must contain an agreement or an endorsement that insurance is provided in accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter for bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of AS

28.20.010

—

28.20.640

.

The motor vehicle liability policy need not insure liability under a workers’ compensation law nor liability for damage to property owned by, rented to, in charge of or transported by the insured.

Every motor vehicle liability policy is subject to the following provisions but these provisions need not be contained in the policy.

The liability of the insurance carrier becomes absolute whenever injury or damage covered by the policy occurs; the policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to this liability after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement made by the insured or on behalf of the insured and no violation of the policy defeats or voids the policy.

The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for injury or damages is not a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on account of injury or damage.

The insurance carrier may settle a claim covered by the policy, and if settlement is made in good faith, the amount of settlement is deductible from the limits of liability specified in (b) of this section.

The policy, the written application for the policy, if any, and every rider or endorsement that does not conflict with the provisions of this chapter constitute the entire contract between the parties.

A policy that grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy may also grant lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a policy and the excess or additional coverage is not subject to the provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy that grants excess or additional coverage the term “motor vehicle liability policy” applies only to that part of the coverage that is required by this section.

A motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this chapter.

A motor vehicle liability policy may provide for proration of the insurance with other valid and collectible insurance.

The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance carriers that together meet the requirements.

A binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy fulfills the requirements for a policy.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a person who resides in the same household as the person named as insured or a person who is a relative of the person named as insured shall be excluded from coverage under a motor vehicle liability policy if the person named as insured requests that that person be excluded from coverage.

History.

(§ 46 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 146 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 202 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 70 SLA 1984; am § 113 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1980, pursuant to § 60, ch. 94, SLA 1980, the term “workers’ compensation” was substituted for “workmen’s compensation.”

Sec. 28.20.445.
Uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage.

The maximum liability of the insurance carrier under the uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage required to be offered under AS

28.20.440

shall be the lesser of

the difference between the amount of the covered person’s damages for bodily injury and property damage and the amount paid to the covered person by or for a person who is or may be held legally liable for the damages; and

the applicable limit of liability of the uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage.

An amount payable under the uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage shall be excess to an amount payable under automobile bodily injury, death, or medical payments coverage, or as workers’ compensation benefits and may not duplicate amounts paid or payable under valid and collectible automobile bodily injury, death, or medical payments coverage, or as workers’ compensation benefits.

If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one coverage when two or more vehicles are insured under one policy, the maximum amount payable may not exceed the highest limit of any one coverage under the policy. If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one motor vehicle policy issued by the same insurer in the same household, the maximum amount payable may be limited to the highest limit of any one coverage under the policies. If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one policy providing motor vehicle liability coverage, payments will be made in the following order of priority, subject to the limit of liability of each applicable policy or coverage:

a policy or coverage covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering a pedestrian as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering the injured person as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a pedestrian as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a pedestrian as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, the injured person as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured.

Uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage does not apply to bodily injury or death or damage to or destruction of property of an insured

while occupying a motor vehicle owned by, but not insured by, the named insured or the insured’s spouse or relative residing in the same household; or

through being struck by a vehicle owned by the named insured or the insured’s spouse or relative residing in the same household.

Uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage

may not apply to bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death of an insured or damage to or destruction of property of an insured until the limits of liability of all bodily injury and property damage liability bonds and policies that apply have been used up by payments, judgments or settlements;

shall be a single combined coverage;

may be rejected by the insured in writing; if the insured has rejected the coverage, the coverage shall not be included in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy unless the insured subsequently requests the coverage in writing; and

need not provide coverage for punitive damages that might otherwise be recoverable from an uninsured or underinsured person.

If both the owner and operator of the uninsured vehicle are unknown, payment under the uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage shall be made only where direct physical contact between the insured and uninsured or underinsured motor vehicles has occurred. A vehicle that has left the scene of the accident with an insured vehicle is presumed to be uninsured if the person insured reports the accident to the appropriate authorities within 24 hours.

The uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage for damage to or destruction of property is subject to a deductible of $250 in any one accident, but the insurer may offer a deductible other than $250. This coverage shall be limited to damage to or destruction of the insured motor vehicle. It may not include loss of use of the vehicle.

[Repealed, § 115 ch 81 SLA 1997.]

The director of the division of insurance shall ensure that policies that provide the uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage required under this chapter clearly state that the uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage provides coverage for the insured for injuries sustained as a pedestrian or bicyclist by a motor vehicle.

History.

(§ 12 ch 70 SLA 1984; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 78 SLA 1990; am § 115 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 172 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 2014; am § 63 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, in (c), in the introductory language, in the second sentence deleted “as a named insured” following “person is entitled”, substituted “motorists” for “motorist” and inserted “in the same household” following “by the same insurer”, in the third sentence, substituted “motorists” for “motorist”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (i).

Sec. 28.20.450.
Notice of cancellation or termination of certified policy.

When an insurance carrier certifies a motor vehicle liability policy under AS

28.20.410

or

28.20.420

the insurance certified may not be cancelled or terminated until at least 10 days after a notice of cancellation or termination of the insurance is filed with the department, except that a policy subsequently procured and certified shall, on the effective date of its certification, terminate for the purpose of this chapter the insurance previously certified for a vehicle designated in both certificates.

History.

(§ 47 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.460.
Chapter not to affect other policies.

This chapter does not apply to or affect a policy of automobile insurance against liability that may now or hereafter be required by any other law of this state, except that the policy, if it contains an agreement or is endorsed to conform with the requirements of this chapter, may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under this chapter.

This chapter does not apply to or affect a policy insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use by persons in the insured’s employ or on behalf of the insured of vehicles not owned by the insured.

History.

(§ 48 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.470.
Bond as proof.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the bond of a surety company authorized to transact business in this state.
The bond shall be conditioned for payment of the amounts specified in AS

28.20.230

. The bond shall be filed with the department and may not be cancellable except after 10 days’ written notice to the department.

History.

(§ 49 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.480.
Action on bond.

If a judgment given against the principal on a bond is not satisfied within 30 days after it becomes final, the judgment creditor may, for the use and benefit and at the sole expense of the judgment creditor, bring an action in the name of the state against the company executing the bond.

History.

(§ 50 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.490.
Money or securities as proof. [Repealed, § 15 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.20.500.
Owner may give proof for others.

The owner of a motor vehicle may give proof of financial responsibility on behalf of the owner’s employee or a member of the owner’s immediate family or household. The furnishing of proof in this manner permits the person for whom it is given to operate a motor vehicle covered by the proof. The department shall endorse appropriate restrictions on the face of the license held by a person for whom proof is given by another, or may issue a new license containing these restrictions.

The department, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of the violation of a restriction, may suspend the license until a certificate is filed showing a policy issued to the driver that covers the driver as operator or owner of the vehicle operated in violation of the restriction.

History.

(§ 53 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.510.
Substitution of proof.

The department shall consent to the cancellation of a bond or certificate of insurance, or the department shall return money or securities to the person entitled to it, upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility under this chapter.

History.

(§ 54 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 214 SLA 1975)

Sec. 28.20.520.
Other proof may be required.

Whenever proof of financial responsibility filed under this chapter no longer fulfills the purpose for which it is required, the department shall require other proof as required by this chapter and shall suspend the license pending the filing of other proof.

History.

(§ 55 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.530.
Application of deposit.

The department shall hold the deposit to satisfy, in accordance with this chapter, any execution on a judgment issued against the person making the deposit for damages, including damages for care and loss of services because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use of it, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of a vehicle subject to registration under the laws of this state after the deposit is made. Money or securities deposited are not subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution arises out of a suit for damages specified in this section.

History.

(§ 52 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 17 ch 214 SLA 1975)

Sec. 28.20.540.
Duration, cancellation, and return of proof.

The department shall, upon request, consent to the immediate cancellation of a bond or certificate of insurance, or shall return to the person entitled to it money or securities deposited as proof of financial responsibility, or shall waive the requirement of filing proof, in any of the following events:

at any time after three years from the date proof is required when, during the three year period preceding the request, the department has not received record of a conviction or a forfeiture of bail that would require or permit the suspension or revocation of the license or registration of the person by or for whom the proof was furnished; or

upon the death of the person on whose behalf the proof was filed or the permanent incapacity of the person to operate a motor vehicle; or

if the person who has given proof surrenders the person’s license to the department.

The department may not consent to the cancellation of a bond or the return of money or securities if an action for damages upon a liability covered by the proof is pending or a judgment upon the liability is unsatisfied, or if the person who filed the bond or deposited money or securities has within one year immediately preceding the request been involved as a driver or owner in a motor vehicle accident resulting in injury or damage to the person or property of others. An affidavit of the applicant as to the nonexistence of these facts, or that the applicant is released from all of this liability, or has been finally adjudicated not to be liable for the injury or damage is sufficient evidence in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the department.

Whenever a person whose proof has been cancelled or returned under (a)(3) of this section applies for a license within a period of three years from the date proof was originally required, the application shall be refused unless the applicant reestablishes the proof for the remainder of the three-year period.

History.

(§ 56 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 18 ch 214 SLA 1975)

Sec. 28.20.550.
Transfer of registration to defeat purpose of chapter prohibited.

If an owner’s registration is suspended under this chapter, the registration may not be transferred nor the vehicle registered in any other name until the department is satisfied that the transfer or registration is proposed in good faith and not for the purpose or with the effect of defeating the purposes of this chapter.

This section does not affect the rights of a conditional vendor, chattel mortgagee, or lessor of the vehicle registered in the name of another as owner who becomes subject to this chapter.

The department shall suspend the registration of a vehicle transferred in violation of this section.

History.

(§ 57 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.560.
Surrender of license and registration, and false affidavits.

A person whose license or registration is suspended under any provision of this chapter, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under this chapter, is canceled or terminated, shall immediately return the person’s license or registration to the department. If a person fails to return the license or registration to the department, the department, through the commissioner of public safety, shall immediately direct a peace officer to obtain possession of it and to return it to the department.

A person who wilfully fails to return a license or registration as required in (a) of this section or who knowingly gives an affidavit required by this chapter that is false is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 58 ch 163 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 99 § 48 (1997))

Sec. 28.20.570.
Forged proof.

A person who forges or, without authority, signs any evidence of proof of financial responsibility for the future, or who files or offers for filing evidence of proof of financial responsibility for the future, knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 59 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.580.
Assigned risk plans.

After consultation with the insurance companies authorized to issue motor vehicle liability policies in this state, the director of the division of insurance shall approve a reasonable plan, fair to the insurers and equitable to their policyholders, for the apportionment among these companies of applicants for motor vehicle policies and other vehicle coverages who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure policies through ordinary methods. When a plan is approved, all the insurance companies shall subscribe to it and participate in it, except a reciprocal insurer formed by and only insuring a group of municipalities or nonprofit utilities under AS 21.75, or a reciprocal insurer formed under AS 21.75 to provide marine insurance. An applicant for an assigned risk policy, a person insured under an assigned risk plan, and an insurance company affected may appeal to the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development from a ruling or decision of the authority designated to operate the plan. Failure to adopt an assigned risk plan does not relieve any person from responsibility under this chapter.

History.

(§ 60 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 110 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 28.20.585.
Reinstatement fee. [Repealed, § 15 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.20.590.
Past application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to an accident or judgment arising from an accident or violation of the motor vehicle laws of this state, occurring before September 1, 1959.

History.

(§ 61 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.600.
Chapter does not prevent other process.

This chapter does not prevent the plaintiff in an action from relying for relief upon other processes provided by law.

History.

(§ 62 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.610.
Provisions of chapter apply throughout state.

The provisions of this chapter apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

History.

(§ 63 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.20.620.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act. [Repealed, § 4 ch 140 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.20.630.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“judgment” means a judgment that is final by expiration without appeal of the time within which an appeal may be taken, or final by affirmation on appeal, given by a court of a state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a vehicle of a type subject to registration under the laws of this state, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of a person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use of property, or upon a cause of action on an agreement of settlement for such damages;

“proof of financial responsibility” means an owner’s motor vehicle liability policy that covers all vehicles owned by the person that are subject to registration in this state, or if the person does not own a vehicle, proof required under AS

28.20.390

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 163 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 135 SLA 1977; am § 28 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For definitions for this title, see AS

28.90.990

and 13 AAC 40.010.

Sec. 28.20.640.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 163 SLA 1959)